Illinois, session 104th, SB2088.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Solid Waste Management Act is 5amended by changing Sections 2 and 2.1 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 20/2)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 7052)7    Sec. 2. Public Policy. (a) The General Assembly finds:8    (1) that current solid waste disposal practices are not 9adequate to address the needs of many metropolitan areas in 10Illinois;11    (2) that the generation of solid waste is increasing while 12landfill capacity is decreasing;13    (3) that siting of new landfills, transfer stations, 14incinerators, recycling facilities, or other solid waste 15management facilities and the expansion of existing facilities 16is very difficult due to the public concern and competition 17with other land uses for suitable sites;18    (4) that more effective and efficient management of solid 19waste is needed in a manner that promotes economic 20development, protects the environment and public health and 21safety, and allows the most practical and beneficial use of 22the material and energy values of solid waste;23    (5) that state government policy and programs should be   SB2088- 2 -LRB104 11356 BDA 21444 b1developed to assist local governments and private industry in 2seeking solutions to solid waste management problems;3    (6) that the purchase of products or supplies made from 4recycled materials by public agencies in the State will divert 5significant quantities of waste from landfills, reduce 6disposal costs and stimulate recycling markets, thereby 7encouraging the further use of recycled materials and 8educating the public about the utility and availability of 9such materials;10    (7) that there are wastes for which combustion would not 11provide practical energy recovery or practical volume 12reduction, which cannot be reasonably recycled or reused and 13which have reduced environmental threat because they are 14non-putrescible, homogeneous and do not contain free liquids. 15Such wastes bear a real and substantial difference under the 16purposes of the Illinois Solid Waste Management Act from solid 17wastes for which combustion would provide practical energy 18recovery or practical volume reduction, which can be 19reasonably recycled or reused, or which are putrescible, 20non-homogeneous or contain free liquids;21    (8) since it is the policy of the State as set forth in the 22Environmental Protection Act to assure that contaminants 23discharged into the atmosphere or waters of the State are 24given the degree of treatment or control necessary to prevent 25pollution, that wastes generated as a result of removing 26contaminants from the air, water or land bear a real and   SB2088- 3 -LRB104 11356 BDA 21444 b1substantial difference from other wastes in that the 2generation of wastes containing pollution treatment residuals 3can improve the environment in Illinois and should be 4encouraged;5    (9) since it is the policy of the State as set forth in the 6Environmental Protection Act to promote conservation of 7natural resources and minimize environmental damage by 8encouraging and effecting recycling and reuse of waste 9materials, that wastes from recycling, reclamation or reuse 10processes designed to remove contaminants so as to render such 11wastes reusable or wastes received at a landfill and recycled 12through an Agency permitted process bear a real and 13substantial difference from wastes not resulting from or 14subject to such recycling, reclamation, or reuse and that 15encouraging such recycling, reclamation or reuse furthers the 16purposes of the Illinois Solid Waste Management Act;17    (10) that there are over 300 landfills in Illinois which 18are permitted to accept only demolition or construction debris 19or landscape waste, the vast majority of which accept less 20than 10,000 cubic yards per year. By themselves these wastes 21pose only a minimal hazard to the environment when landfilled 22in compliance with regulatory requirements in an 23Agency-permitted site without commingling with other wastes 24and, as such, landfills receiving only such wastes bear a real 25and substantial difference from landfills receiving wastes 26which are commingled. Disposal of these wastes in landfills   SB2088- 4 -LRB104 11356 BDA 21444 b1permitted for municipal wastes uses up increasingly scarce 2capacity for garbage, general household and commercial waste. 3It is the policy of the State to encourage disposal of these 4wastes in separate landfills.5    (b) It is the purpose of this Act to reduce reliance on 6land disposal of solid waste, to encourage and promote 7alternative means of managing solid waste, and to assist local 8governments with solid waste planning and management, and to 9promote conversion into environmentally safe products. In 10furtherance of those aims, while recognizing that landfills 11will continue to be necessary, this Act establishes the 12following waste management hierarchy, in descending order of 13preference, as State policy:14    (1) volume reduction at the source;15    (2) recycling and reuse;16    (3) thermal conversion; 17    (4) (3) combustion with energy recovery;18    (5) (4) combustion for volume reduction;19    (6) (5) disposal in landfill facilities.20(Source: P.A. 85-1440.) 21    (415 ILCS 20/2.1)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 7052.1)22    Sec. 2.1. Definitions. When used in this Act, unless the 23context otherwise requires, the following terms have the 24meanings ascribed to them in this Section:25    "Agency" means the Environmental Protection Agency.   SB2088- 5 -LRB104 11356 BDA 21444 b1    "Department", when a particular entity is not specified, 2means (i) in the case of a function to be performed on or after 3July 1, 1995 (the effective date of the Department of Natural 4Resources Act) and until the effective date of this amendatory 5Act of the 102nd General Assembly, the Department of Commerce 6and Community Affairs (now Department of Commerce and Economic 7Opportunity), as successor to the former Department of Energy 8and Natural Resources under the Department of Natural 9Resources Act; or (ii) in the case of a function required to be 10performed before July 1, 1995, the former Illinois Department 11of Energy and Natural Resources.12    "Deinked stock" means paper that has been processed to 13remove inks, clays, coatings, binders and other contaminants.14    "End product" means only those items that are designed to 15be used until disposal; items designed to be used in 16production of a subsequent item are excluded.17    "High grade printing and writing papers" includes offset 18printing paper, duplicator paper, writing paper (stationery), 19office paper, note pads, xerographic paper, envelopes, form 20bond including computer paper and carbonless forms, book 21papers, bond papers, ledger paper, book stock and cotton fiber 22papers.23    "Paper and paper products" means high grade printing and 24writing papers, tissue products, newsprint, unbleached 25packaging and recycled paperboard.26    "Postconsumer material" means only those products   SB2088- 6 -LRB104 11356 BDA 21444 b1generated by a business or consumer which have served their 2intended end uses, and which have been separated or diverted 3from solid waste; wastes generated during production of an end 4product are excluded.5    "Recovered paper material" means paper waste generated 6after the completion of the papermaking process, such as 7postconsumer materials, envelope cuttings, bindery trimmings, 8printing waste, cutting and other converting waste, butt 9rolls, and mill wrappers, obsolete inventories, and rejected 10unused stock. "Recovered paper material", however, does not 11include fibrous waste generated during the manufacturing 12process such as fibers recovered from waste water or trimmings 13of paper machine rolls (mill broke), or fibrous byproducts of 14harvesting, extraction or woodcutting processes, or forest 15residues such as bark.16    "Recycled paperboard" includes recycled paperboard 17products, folding cartons and pad backing.18    "Recycling" means the process by which solid waste is 19collected, separated and processed for reuse as either a raw 20material or a product which itself is subject to recycling, 21but does not include the combustion of waste for energy 22recovery or volume reduction.23    "Thermal conversion" means the process by which a solid 24feedstock can be converted to produce environmentally safe 25products, including, but not limited to, liquid fuels, 26chemicals, hydrogen, and other products.   SB2088- 7 -LRB104 11356 BDA 21444 b1    "Tissue products" includes toilet tissue, paper towels, 2paper napkins, facial tissue, paper doilies, industrial 3wipers, paper bags and brown papers.4    "Unbleached packaging" includes corrugated and fiber 5boxes.6    "USEPA Guidelines for federal procurement" means all 7minimum recycled content standards recommended by the U.S. 8Environmental Protection Agency.9(Source: P.A. 102-444, eff. 8-20-21.)